District of Columbia statutes.
33-408

Repealed

Role of partners in partnership business; acts requiring authorization for binding; acts requiring authorization by all partners.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 637, Pub. L. 87-709, § 9
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1981 Ed., § 41-108.
1973 Ed., § 41-308.